California statutes. Penal Code
(c) The committee shall meet at least twice annually. Subcommittees shall be formed and meet as necessary. All meetings shall be open to the public and reports shall be made available to the Legislature and other interested parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 841, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13101.

As used in this chapter, “criminal justice agencies” are those agencies at all levels of government which perform as their principal functions, activities which either:

(a) Relate to the apprehension, prosecution, adjudication, incarceration, or correction of criminal offenders; or

(b) Relate to the collection, storage, dissemination or usage of criminal offender record information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13102.

As used in this chapter, “criminal offender record information” means records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies for purposes of identifying criminal offenders and of maintaining as to each such offender a summary of arrests, pretrial proceedings, the nature and disposition of criminal charges, sentencing, incarceration, rehabilitation, and release.

Such information shall be restricted to that which is recorded as the result of an arrest, detention, or other initiation of criminal proceedings or of any consequent proceedings related thereto. It shall be understood to include, where appropriate, such items for each person arrested as the following:

(a) Personal indentification.

(b) The fact, date, and arrest charge; whether the individual was subsequently released and, if so, by what authority and upon what terms.

(c) The fact, date, and results of any pretrial proceedings.

(d) The fact, date, and results of any trial or proceeding, including any sentence or penalty.

(e) The fact, date, and results of any direct or collateral review of that trial or proceeding; the period and place of any confinement, including admission, release; and, where appropriate, readmission and rerelease dates.

(f) The fact, date, and results of any release proceedings.

(g) The fact, date, and authority of any act of pardon or clemency.

(h) The fact and date of any formal termination to the criminal justice process as to that charge or conviction.

(i) The fact, date, and results of any proceeding revoking probation or parole.

It shall not include intelligence, analytical, and investigative reports and files, nor statistical records and reports in which individuals are not identified and from which their identities are not ascertainable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13103.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law relating to retention of public records, any criminal justice agency may cause the original records filed pursuant to this chapter to be destroyed if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The records have been reproduced onto microfilm or optical disk, or by any other techniques which do not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the original document.

(b) If the records have been reproduced onto optical disk, at least one year has elapsed since the date of registration of the records.

(c) The nonerasable storage medium used meets the minimum standards recommended by the National Institute of Standards and Technology for permanent record purposes.

(d) Adequate provisions are made to ensure that the nonerasable storage medium reflects additions or corrections to the records.

(e) A copy of the nonerasable storage medium is maintained in a manner which permits it to be used for all purposes served by the original record.

(f) A copy of the nonerasable storage medium has been stored at a separate physical location in a place and manner which will reasonably assure its preservation indefinitely against loss or destruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 257, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

13104.

Any certified reproduction of any record stored on a nonerasable storage medium under the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be a certification of the original record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 257, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recording Information [13125. - 13128.]

13125.

All basic information stored in state or local criminal offender record information systems shall be recorded, when applicable and available, in the form of the following standard data elements:The following personal identification data:Name—(full name)AliasesMonikersRaceSexDate
 of birthPlace of birth (state or country)HeightWeightHair colorEye colorCII numberFBI numberSocial security numberCalifornia operator’s license numberFingerprint classification numberHenryNCICAddressThe following arrest
 data:Arresting agencyBooking numberDate of arrestOffenses chargedStatute citationsLiteral descriptionsPolice dispositionReleasedCited and releasedTurned over toComplaint filedThe following misdemeanor or infraction data or preliminary 
hearing data:County and court nameDate complaint filedOriginal offenses charged in a complaint
or citationHeld to answerCertified pleaDispositionNot convictedDismissedAcquittedCourt trialJury trialConvictedPleaCourt trialJury trialDate of dispositionConvicted offensesSentenceSentence enhancement data elementsProceedings suspendedReason suspendedThe following superior court data:CountyDate complaint filedType of proceedingIndictmentInformationCertificationOriginal offenses charged in
 indictment or 
informationDispositionNot convictedDismissedAcquittedCourt trialJury trialOn transcriptConvicted—felony, misdemeanorPleaCourt trialJury trialOn transcriptDate of dispositionConvicted
 offensesSentenceSentence enhancement data elementsProceedings suspendedReason suspendedSource of reopened casesThe following corrections data:Adult probationCountyType of courtCourt numberOffenseDate on probationDate removedReason for
 removalJail (unsentenced prisoners only)Offenses chargedName of jail or institutionDate receivedDate releasedReason for releaseBail on own recognizanceBailOtherCommitting agencyCounty jail (sentenced prisoners only)Name of jail, camp, or otherConvicted offenseSentenceSentence enhancement data elementsDate receivedDate releasedReason for releaseCommitting agencyDivision of Juvenile JusticeCountyType of courtCourt number Division of Juvenile Justice numberDate receivedConvicted offenseType of receiptOriginal commitmentParole violatorDate releasedType of releaseCustodySupervisionDate terminatedDepartment of Corrections and RehabilitationCountyType of courtCourt numberDepartment of Corrections and Rehabilitation numberDate receivedConvicted
 offenseType of receiptOriginal commitmentParole violatorDate releasedType of releaseCustodySupervisionDate terminatedMentally disordered sex offendersCountyHospital numberDate receivedDate dischargedRecommendation

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 541, Sec. 16.   (SB 384)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13127.

Each recording agency shall insure that each portion of a criminal offender record that it originates shall include, for all felonies and reportable misdemeanors, the state or local unique and permanent fingerprint identification number, within 72 hours of origination of such records, excluding Saturday, Sunday, and holidays.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13128.

For purposes of the maintenance of criminal records pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 653.75) of Title 15, whenever a person is arrested for a public offense committed while in custody in any local detention facility, as defined in Section 6031.4, or any state prison, as defined in Section 4504, the state summary criminal history record shall include the section number of the public offense violated and information related to the “in custody” status of that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1005, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reporting Information [13150. - 13155.]

13150.

(a) For each arrest made, the reporting agency shall report to the Department of Justice, concerning each arrest, the applicable identification and arrest data described in Section 13125 and fingerprints, including the CII number and incident report number, except as otherwise provided by law or as prescribed by the Department of Justice.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 581, Sec. 2.   (AB 1331)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.

(a) The superior court that disposes of a case for which an arrest was required to be reported to the Department of Justice pursuant to Section 13150 or for which fingerprints were taken and submitted to the Department of Justice by order of the court shall ensure that a disposition report of a case containing the applicable data elements enumerated in Section 13125, including the CII number and the court docket number, or Section 13151.1 if the disposition is one of dismissal, is furnished to the Department of Justice within 30 days according to the procedures and in a format prescribed by the department. The court shall also furnish a copy of the disposition report to the law enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction to investigate the offense alleged in the complaint or accusation. When a court orders an action subsequent
 to the initial disposition of a case, the court shall similarly report the proceedings to the department, including a transfer of probation or mandatory supervision pursuant to Section 1203.9 by the transferring court, once the case is accepted by the receiving court. A probation or mandatory supervision transfer report shall identify the receiving superior court and the new case number, if any. When filing a case with the court, the criminal justice agency shall include the CII number in the filing.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 197, Sec. 30.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

13151.1.

When a disposition described in Section 13151 is one of dismissal of the charge, the disposition report shall state one of the following reasons, as appropriate:

(a) Dismissal in furtherance of justice, pursuant to Section 1385 of the Penal Code. In addition to this dismissal label, the court shall set forth the particular reasons for dismissal.

(b) Case compromised; defendant discharged because restitution or other satisfaction was made to the injured person, pursuant to Sections 1377 and 1378.

(c) Court found insufficient cause to believe defendant guilty of a public offense; defendant discharged without trial pursuant to Section 871.

(d) Dismissal due to delay; action against defendant dismissed because the information was not filed or the action was not brought to trial within the time allowed by Section 1381, 1381.5, or 1382.

(e) Accusation set aside pursuant to Section 995. In addition to this dismissal label, the court shall set forth the particular reasons for the dismissal.

(f) Defective accusation; defendant discharged pursuant to Section 1008, when the action is dismissed pursuant to that section after demurrer is sustained, because no amendment of the accusatory pleading is permitted or amendment is not made or filed within the time allowed.

(g) Defendant became a witness for the people and was discharged pursuant to Section 1099.

(h) Defendant discharged at trial because of insufficient evidence, in order to become a witness for his codefendant pursuant to Section 1100.

(i) Judgment arrested; defendant discharged, when the court finds defects in the accusatory pleading pursuant to Sections 1185 to 1187, inclusive, and defendant is released pursuant to Section 1188.

(j) Judgment arrested; defendant recommitted, when the court finds defects in the accusatory pleading pursuant to Sections 1185 to 1187, inclusive, and defendant is recommitted to answer a new indictment or information pursuant to Section 1188.

(k) Mistrial; defendant discharged. In addition to this dismissal label, the court shall set forth the particular reasons for its declaration of a mistrial. 

(l) Mistrial; defendant recommitted. In addition to this dismissal label, the court shall set forth the particular reasons for its declaration of a mistrial.

(m) Any other dismissal by which the case was terminated. In addition to the dismissal label, the court shall set forth the particular reasons for the disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

13152.

Both admission and release from detention facilities shall be reported by the detention agency to the Department of Justice within 30 days of that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   (AB 2080)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

13153.

Criminal offender record information relating to arrests for being found in any public place under the influence of intoxicating liquor under subdivision (f) of Section 647 shall not be reported or maintained by the Department of Justice without special individual justification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

13154.

Each reporting agency shall report to the Department of Justice each arrest for the commission of a public offense while in custody in any local detention facility, or any state prison, as provided in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 653.75) of Title 15, for inclusion in that person’s state summary criminal history record. The report shall include the public offense committed and a reference indicating that the offense occurred while the person was in custody in a local detention facility or state prison.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1005, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13155.

Commencing January 1, 2013, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall collect from trial courts information regarding the implementation of the 2011 Realignment Legislation. That information shall include statistics for each county regarding the dispositions of felonies at sentencing and petitions to revoke probation, postrelease community supervision, mandatory supervision, and, commencing July 1, 2013, parole. The data shall be provided not less frequently than twice a year by the trial courts to the Administrative Office of the Courts. Funds provided to the trial courts for the implementation of criminal justice realignment may be used for the purpose of collecting the information and providing it to the Administrative Office of the Courts. The Administrative Office of the Courts
 shall make this data available to the Department of Finance, the Board of State and Community Corrections, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee on or before September 1, 2013, and annually thereafter. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Administrative Office of the Courts promote collaboration and the reduction of duplication of data collection and reporting efforts where possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 83.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Information Service [13175. - 13177.]

13175.

When a criminal justice agency supplies fingerprints, or a fingerprint identification number, or such other personal identifiers as the Department of Justice deems appropriate, to the Department of Justice, such agency shall, upon request, be provided with identification, arrest, and, where applicable, final disposition data relating to such person within 72 hours of receipt by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13176.

When a criminal justice agency entitled to such information supplies fingerprints, or a fingerprint identification number, or such other personal identifiers as the Department of Justice deems appropriate, to the Department of Justice, such agency shall, upon request, be provided with the criminal history of such person, or the needed portion thereof, within 72 hours of receipt by the Department of Justice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13177.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the Department of Justice from requiring criminal justice agencies to report any information which is required by any other statute to be reported to the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Access to Information [13200. - 13203.]

13200.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect the right of access of any person or public agency to individual criminal offender record information that is authorized by any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13201.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize access of any person or public agency to individual criminal offender record information unless such access is otherwise authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 992.)
-------------------------------------------

13202.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (g) of Section 11105 and subdivision (a) of Section 13305, every public agency or bona fide research institution concerned with the prevention or control of crime, the quality of criminal justice, or the custody or correction of offenders may be provided with criminal offender record information, including criminal court records, as required for the performance of its duties, including the conduct of
 research. The California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis and researchers affiliated with the center shall be provided with criminal offender record information as required for its research. The material identifying individuals shall only be provided for research and statistical activities and shall not be transferred, revealed, or used for purposes other than research or statistical activities. Reports or publications derived
 from this information shall not identify specific individuals. Reasonable costs to the department associated with the department’s processing of that data may be billed to the researcher. If a request for data or letter of support for research using the data is denied, the department shall provide a written statement of the specific reasons for the denial. A person shall not be denied information pursuant to this section solely on the basis of that person’s criminal record unless the person has been convicted of a felony or another offense that involves moral turpitude, dishonesty, or fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 253, Sec. 3.   (AB 173)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

13203.

(a) A criminal justice agency may release, within five years of the arrest, information concerning an arrest or detention of a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, an applicant for a position as a peace officer, a nonsworn employee of a criminal justice agency, or an applicant for a nonsworn position within a criminal justice agency that did not result in conviction, and for which the person did not complete a postarrest diversion program, to a governmental agency employer of that employee or applicant.

(b) A criminal justice agency may release information concerning an arrest of a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, an applicant for a
 position as a peace officer, a nonsworn employee of a criminal justice agency, or an applicant for a nonsworn position within a criminal justice agency that did not result in conviction but for which the person completed a postarrest diversion program or a deferred entry of judgment program, or information concerning a referral to and participation in any postarrest diversion program or a deferred entry of judgment program to a governmental agency employer of that employee or applicant.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or (b), a criminal justice agency shall not release information under the following circumstances:

(1) Information concerning an arrest for which diversion or deferred entry of judgment has been ordered without attempting to determine whether diversion or a
 deferred entry of judgment program has been successfully completed.

(2) Information concerning an arrest or detention followed by a dismissal or release without attempting to determine whether the individual was exonerated.

(3) Information concerning an arrest without a disposition without attempting to determine whether diversion or a deferred entry of judgment program has been successfully completed or the individual was exonerated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 158, Sec. 2.   (AB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Local Summary Criminal History Information [13300. - 13305.]

13300.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Local summary criminal history information” means the master record of information compiled by any local criminal justice agency pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Title 3 of Part 4 pertaining to the identification and criminal history of any person, such as name, date of birth, physical description, dates of arrests, arresting agencies and booking numbers, charges, dispositions, and similar data about the person.

(2) “Local summary criminal history information” does not refer to records and data compiled by criminal justice agencies other than that local agency, nor
 does it refer to records of complaints to or investigations conducted by, or records of intelligence information or security procedures of, the local agency.

(3) “Local agency” means a local criminal justice agency.

(b) A local agency shall furnish local summary criminal history information to any of the following, when needed in the course of their duties, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any entity, in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:

(1) The courts of the state.

(2) Peace officers of the state, as defined in Section 830.1, subdivisions (a) and (d) of Section 830.2, subdivisions (a), (b), and (j) of Section 830.3, and subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 830.5.

(3) District attorneys of the state.

(4) Prosecuting city attorneys of any city within the state.

(5) City attorneys pursuing civil gang injunctions pursuant to Section 186.22a, drug abatement actions pursuant to Section 3479 or 3480 of the Civil Code or Section 11571 of the Health and Safety Code, or a city attorney or county counsel pursuing gun violence restraining orders pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100) of Title 2 of Part 6.

(6) Probation officers of the state.

(7) Parole officers of the state.

(8) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in proceedings upon a petition for a certificate of rehabilitation and pardon pursuant to Section 4852.08.

(9) A public defender or attorney of record when representing a person in a criminal case, or a parole, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision revocation or revocation extension hearing, and when authorized access by statutory or decisional law.

(10) Any agency, officer, or official of the state when the local summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute,
 regulation, or ordinance that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the local summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon the specified criminal conduct.

(11) Any city, county, city and county, or district, or any officer or official thereof, when access is needed in order to assist the agency, officer, or official in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, and when the access is specifically authorized by the city council, board of supervisors, or governing board of the city, county, or district when the local summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute, regulation, or ordinance that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the local summary
 criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon the specified criminal conduct.

(12) The subject of the local summary criminal history information.

(13) Any person or entity when access is expressly authorized by statute when the local summary criminal history information is required to implement a statute, regulation, or ordinance that expressly refers to specific criminal conduct applicable to the subject person of the local summary criminal history information, and contains requirements or exclusions, or both, expressly based upon the specified criminal conduct.

(14) Any managing or supervising correctional officer of a county jail or other county
 correctional facility.

(15) Local child support agencies established by Section 17304 of the Family Code. When a local child support agency closes a support enforcement case containing summary criminal history information, the agency shall delete or purge from the file and destroy any documents or information concerning or arising from offenses for or of which the parent has been arrested, charged, or convicted, other than for offenses related to the parents having failed to provide support for the minor children, consistent with Section 17531 of the Family Code.

(16) County child welfare agency personnel who have been delegated the authority of county probation officers to access state summary criminal information pursuant to Section 272 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for
 the purposes specified in Section 16504.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(17) A humane officer appointed pursuant to Section 14502 of the Corporations Code, for the purposes of performing the officer’s duties. A local agency may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of providing information pursuant to this paragraph.

(c) The local agency may furnish local summary criminal history information, upon a showing of a compelling need, to any of the following, provided that when information is furnished to assist an agency, officer, or official of state or local government, a public utility, or any entity, in fulfilling employment, certification, or licensing duties, Chapter 1321 of the Statutes of 1974 and Section 432.7 of the Labor Code shall apply:

(1) Any public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, that operates a nuclear energy facility when access is needed to assist in employing persons to work at the facility, provided that, if the local agency supplies the information, it shall furnish a copy of this information to the person to whom the information relates.

(2) To a peace officer of the state other than those included in subdivision (b).

(3) An animal control officer, authorized to exercise powers specified in Section 830.9, for the purposes of performing the officer’s official duties. A local agency may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of providing information pursuant to this paragraph.

(4) To a peace officer of another country.

(5) To public officers, other than peace officers, of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the United States, provided that access to records similar to local summary criminal history information is expressly authorized by a statute of the United States, other states, or possessions or territories of the United States when this information is needed for the performance of their official duties.

(6) To any person when disclosure is requested by a probation, parole, or peace officer with the consent of the subject of the local summary criminal history information and for purposes of furthering the rehabilitation of the subject.

(7) The courts of the United States, other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.

(8) Peace officers of the United States, other states, or territories or possessions of the United States.

(9) To any individual who is the subject of the record requested when needed in conjunction with an application to enter the United States or any foreign nation.

(10) Any public utility, as defined in Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code, when access is needed to assist in employing persons who will be seeking entrance to private residences in the course of their employment. The information provided shall be limited to the record of convictions and any
 arrest for which the person is released on bail or on the person’s own recognizance pending trial.

If the local agency supplies the information pursuant to this paragraph, it shall furnish a copy of the information to the person to whom the information relates.

Any information obtained from the local summary criminal history is confidential and the receiving public utility shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. The local summary criminal history information in the possession of the public utility and all copies made from it shall be destroyed 30 days after employment is denied or granted, including any appeal periods, except for those cases where an employee or applicant is out on bail or on the person’s own recognizance pending trial, in which case the state
 summary criminal history information and all copies shall be destroyed 30 days after the case is resolved, including any appeal periods.

A violation of any of the provisions of this paragraph is a misdemeanor, and shall give the employee or applicant who is injured by the violation a cause of action against the public utility to recover damages proximately caused by the violation.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing any duty upon public utilities to request local summary criminal history information on any current or prospective employee.

Seeking entrance to private residences in the course of employment shall be deemed a “compelling need” as required to be shown in this subdivision.

(11) Any city,
 county, city and county, or district, or any officer or official thereof, if a written request is made to a local law enforcement agency and the information is needed to assist in the screening of a prospective concessionaire, and any affiliate or associate thereof, as these terms are defined in subdivision (k) of Section 432.7 of the Labor Code, for the purposes of consenting to, or approving of, the prospective concessionaire’s application for, or acquisition of, any beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest.

Any local government’s request for local summary criminal history information for purposes of screening a prospective concessionaire and their affiliates or associates before approving or denying an application for, or acquisition of, any beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest is deemed a
 “compelling need” as required by this subdivision. However, only local summary criminal history information pertaining to criminal convictions may be obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

Any information obtained from the local summary criminal history is confidential and the receiving local government shall not disclose its contents, other than for the purpose for which it was acquired. The local summary criminal history information in the possession of the local government and all copies made from it shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after the local government’s final decision to grant or deny consent to, or approval of, the prospective concessionaire’s application for, or acquisition of, a beneficial interest in a concession, lease, or other property interest. Nothing in this section shall be construed as imposing any duty upon a local government, or
 any officer or official thereof, to request local summary criminal history information on any current or prospective concessionaire or their affiliates or associates.

(12) A public agency described in subdivision (b) of Section 15975 of the Government Code, for the purpose of oversight and enforcement policies with respect to its contracted providers.

(d) Whenever an authorized request for local summary criminal history information pertains to a person whose fingerprints are on file with the local agency and the local agency has no criminal history of that person, and the information is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the fingerprint card accompanying the request for information, if any, may be stamped “no criminal record” and returned to the person or
 entity making the request.

(e) A local agency taking fingerprints of a person who is an applicant for licensing, employment, or certification may charge a fee to cover the cost of taking the fingerprints and processing the required documents.

(f) Whenever local summary criminal history information furnished pursuant to this section is to be used for employment, licensing, or certification purposes, the local agency shall charge the person or entity making the request a fee that it determines to be sufficient to reimburse the local agency for the cost of furnishing the information, provided that no fee shall be charged to any public law enforcement agency for local summary criminal history information furnished to assist it in employing, licensing, or certifying a person
 who is applying for employment with the agency as a peace officer or criminal investigator. Any state agency required to pay a fee to the local agency for information received under this section may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse the agency for the expense.

(g) Whenever there is a conflict, the processing of criminal fingerprints shall take priority over the processing of applicant fingerprints.

(h) It is not a violation of this article to disseminate statistical or research information obtained from a record, provided that the identity of the subject of the record is not disclosed.

(i) It is not a violation of this article to include information obtained from a record in (1) a transcript or
 record of a judicial or administrative proceeding or (2) any other public record when the inclusion of the information in the public record is authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, a public prosecutor may, in response to a written request made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 7922.500) and Article 2 (commencing with Section 7922.525) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, provide information from a local summary criminal history, if release of the information would enhance public safety, the interest of justice, or the public’s understanding of the justice system and the person making the request declares that the request is made for a scholarly or journalistic purpose. If a person in a declaration required by this subdivision willfully states as
 true any material fact that person knows to be false, the person shall be subject to a civil penalty not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The requestor shall be informed in writing of this penalty. An action to impose a civil penalty under this subdivision may be brought by any public prosecutor and shall be enforced as a civil judgment.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Justice or any state or local law enforcement agency may require the submission of fingerprints for the purpose of conducting summary criminal history information record checks that are authorized by law.

(l) Any local criminal justice agency may release, within five years of the arrest, information concerning an arrest or detention of a peace officer or applicant for a
 position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, that did not result in conviction, and for which the person did not complete a postarrest diversion program or a deferred entry of judgment program, to a governmental agency employer of that peace officer or applicant.

(m) Any local criminal justice agency may release information concerning an arrest of a peace officer or applicant for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, that did not result in conviction but for which the person completed a postarrest diversion program or a deferred entry of judgment program, or information concerning a referral to and participation in any postarrest diversion program or a deferred entry of judgment program to a governmental agency employer of that peace officer or applicant.

(n) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) or (m), a local criminal justice agency shall not release information under the following circumstances:

(1) Information concerning an arrest for which diversion or a deferred entry of judgment program has been ordered without attempting to determine whether diversion or a deferred entry of judgment program has been successfully completed.

(2) Information concerning an arrest or detention followed by a dismissal or release without attempting to determine whether the individual was exonerated.

(3) Information concerning an arrest without a disposition without attempting to determine whether diversion has been successfully completed or the individual was exonerated.

(o) A public prosecutor may provide a public defender’s office, an alternate public defender’s office, or a licensed attorney of record in a criminal case with a list containing only the names of the peace officer and defendant and the corresponding case number to facilitate and expedite notifying counsel representing criminal defendants whose cases may involve testimony by that peace officer of exculpatory or impeachment evidence involving that peace officer. Any disclosure made pursuant to this subdivision shall only be made upon agreement by the public defender’s office, alternate public defender’s office, or the licensed attorney of record in a criminal case. Any disclosure pursuant to this subdivision shall not constitute disclosure under any other law, nor shall any privilege or confidentiality be deemed waived by that disclosure. This
 subdivision shall not be construed to otherwise limit any legal mandate to disclose evidence or information, including, but not limited to, the disclosures required under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 539, Sec. 3.   (AB 2917)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13301.

As used in this article:

(a) “Record” means the master local summary criminal history information as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 13300, or a copy thereof.

(b) “A person authorized by law to receive a record” means any person or public agency authorized by a court, statute, or decisional law to receive a record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 339.)
-------------------------------------------

13302.
